Wyoming, session 2026, SF0118.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-26-802, 1-26-803, 1-26-810(a)(iii),
1-26-815(a), 15-7-101(a)(ii) and (iii)(A), 35-3-110,
36-10-101, 41-2-124 by creating a new subsection (m),
41-3-102(a), 41-3-742(a)(iii), 41-3-906, 41-3-1013,
41-7-210(a)(iv)(E), 41-7-808, 41-8-113(a)(iii), 41-9-202
and 41-10-113(a)(xix) are amended to read:

SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293
1-26-802. Proceedings by water companies and
incorporated cities or towns.

Subject to the requirements of W.S. 41-2-124(m), any water
company or incorporated city or town of this state may
acquire by purchase, grant or condemnation any land, real
estate, claim, easement or right-of-way required for or
that may be affected by the construction, operation or
maintenance of any waterworks.

1-26-803. Municipal streets and alleys; utility mains
or pipes; tax levy.

Subject to the requirements of W.S. 41-2-124(m) if
applicable, any incorporated city or town in Wyoming may
use or authorize the use of its streets and alleys by
others, and may obtain by purchase, grant or condemnation
in the manner provided by law all necessary lands for the
construction, laying and operating of mains or pipes for
sewers, gas or water for the use of the cities and towns,
and for that purpose to have the power to levy a tax within
the constitutional limits upon all personal and real
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293
property within the corporate limits of the cities and
towns.

1-26-810. Powers of railroad companies relative to
condemnation generally.

(a) Any railroad company organized under the laws of
this state, the laws of the United States or which has been
duly organized under the laws of any other state and has
filed copies of its articles of incorporation with the
secretary of state in this state as required by law is
authorized to:

(iii) Notwithstanding W.S. 41-2-124(m), acquire
a right to conduct water by aqueducts and to make
appropriate drains.

1-26-815. Right of eminent domain granted; ways of
necessity for authorized businesses; purposes; extent.

(a) Subject to the requirements of W.S. 41-2-124(m)
if applicable, any person, association, company or
corporation authorized to do business in this state may
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293
appropriate by condemnation a way of necessity over, across
or on so much of the lands or real property of others as
necessary for the location, construction, maintenance and
use of reservoirs, drains, flumes, ditches including return
flow and wastewater ditches, underground water pipelines,
pumping stations and other necessary appurtenances, canals,
electric power transmission lines and distribution systems,
railroad trackage, sidings, spur tracks, tramways, roads or
mine truck haul roads required in the course of their
business for agricultural, mining, exploration drilling and
production of oil and gas, milling, electric power
transmission and distribution, domestic, municipal or
sanitary purposes, or for the transportation of coal from
any coal mine or railroad line or for the transportation of
oil and gas from any well.

15-7-101. Purposes.

(a) In addition to all other powers provided by law,
any city or town may make public improvements as follows
for which bonds may be issued to the contractor or be sold
as provided in this chapter to:

SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293
(ii) Establish, construct, purchase, extend,
maintain and regulate a system of water works, for the
purpose of supplying water for extinguishing fires and for
domestic, manufacturing and other purposes. To carry out
this power, or to prevent pollution or injury to the
streams, springs or source of supply of its water works,
ditches or reservoirs, any city or town may go beyond its
corporate limits and take, hold and acquire property by
purchase or otherwise and, subject to the requirements of
W.S. 41-2-124(m) if applicable, may take and condemn all
necessary land and property. Jurisdiction of a city or town
shall extend up and along the stream or source of supply
for the entire distance occupied by such water works,
ditches or reservoirs. Cities or towns may enact ordinances
and make all necessary rules and regulations for the
government and protection of their water works, ditches and
reservoirs, and fix water rates and provide for their
collection. All water rent collected except the amount
required to pay the expense of maintaining, extending and
improving the water works, shall become a part of the water
bond fund, and be applied only to the payment of the
principal and interest of the bonds issued for the
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293
construction, purchase, maintaining or extension of the
water works;

(iii) Take any action necessary to establish,
purchase, extend, maintain and regulate a water system for
supplying water to and diverting surface water runoff from
its inhabitants and their property and for any other public
purposes, including:

(A) Condemnation of property, subject to
the requirements of W.S. 41-2-124(m) if applicable;

35-3-110. Eminent domain; power conferred.

Subject to the requirements of W.S. 41-2-124(m) if
applicable, such sanitary and improvement district may
acquire by purchase, condemnation or otherwise, real or
personal property, right-of-way, and privilege, within or
without its corporate limits, necessary for its corporate
purposes.

36-10-101. Authority to acquire state lands;
reservation of mineral rights.
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293

Notwithstanding W.S. 41-2-124(m), the United States shall
be and is authorized to acquire by purchase or condemnation
or otherwise, any land in this state required for public
buildings, custom houses, arsenals, national cemeteries, or
other purposes essential to the national defense in
necessary use of said land by armed naval, air or land
forces, or land to be physically occupied by the Boysen
Dam, its reservoir, power plant and distribution systems,
or lands to be physically occupied by dams, reservoirs,
power plants and distribution systems in United States
reclamation service projects, and the state of Wyoming
hereby consents thereto, provided that the mineral content
of lands so acquired, if owners thereof so elect, shall be
reserved to such owners.

41-2-124. Accounts created; unexpended balance.

(m) Except as otherwise provided by law, when
appropriating funds for any project from the accounts
created by subsection (a) of this section and only after
receipt of a recommendation of the water development
commission, the legislature shall specify whether the power
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293
of eminent domain may be utilized to complete a project for
which funds are appropriated. If it is determined after an
appropriation is made that the power of eminent domain is
needed to complete a project, the project's sponsor and the
water development commission shall notify the legislature
of the need for the use of eminent domain and the
appropriated funds shall not be expended for that project
unless the legislature authorizes the use through
legislation enacted during a subsequent legislative
session.

41-3-102. Preferred uses; defined; order of
preference.

(a) Water rights are hereby defined as follows
according to use: preferred uses shall include rights for
domestic and transportation purposes, steam power plants,
and industrial purposes; existing rights not preferred, may
be condemned to supply water for such preferred uses in
accordance with the provisions of the law relating to
condemnation of property for public and semi-public
purposes, including the requirements of W.S. 41-2-124(m),
except as hereinafter provided.
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293

41-3-742. Powers generally.

(a) The board shall have power on behalf of said
districts:

(iii) Subject to the requirements of W.S.
41-2-124(m) if applicable, to have and to exercise the
power of eminent domain and in the manner provided by law
for the condemnation of private property for public use to
take any property necessary to the exercise of the powers
herein granted;

41-3-906. Application; rights subject to preferences;
rights of municipal corporations.

Rights to underground water shall be subject to the same
preferences as provided by law for surface waters, and
rights not preferred may be condemned and changed to a
preferred use in the manner provided by law for surface
waters subject to the requirements of W.S. 41-2-124(m).
Nothing herein contained shall be construed to impair the
rights of municipal corporations to acquire any underground
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293
water or underground water rights for a necessary public
purpose by eminent domain or condemnation proceedings but
W.S. 41-2-124(m) shall remain applicable.

41-3-1013. Condemnation for municipal water purposes.

Notwithstanding W.S. 1-26-505 and subject to the
requirements of W.S. 41-2-124(m), a city or town may
condemn any portion of a water right authorized and
acquired under this act for municipal water purposes in the
manner provided by law.

41-7-210. Court's order.

(a) If the issues at this hearing are decided in
favor of the petitioners, the court shall make an order:

(iv) Establishing said district as a corporation
by the name proposed with powers:

(E) To exercise the power of eminent domain
under chapter 316 (C.S. 1920) W.S. 1-26-501 through
1-26-818, and all acts or parts of acts amendatory thereto;
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293

41-7-808. Powers; eminent domain; application of
provisions.

All provisions of law now applicable to irrigation
districts, privately owned irrigation corporations, ditch
companies, or power districts or power corporations, as
regards the exercise of the power of eminent domain, the
use and occupation of state and other public lands and
highways, the appropriation, or other acquisition or use of
water, waterpower, water rights, or water diversion or
storage rights, for any of the purposes contemplated in
this act, the manner or method of construction and physical
operation of irrigation works, storage dams, distribution
systems, power plants, transmission lines and power
systems, as herein contemplated, shall be applicable as
nearly as may be, and insofar as not in conflict with the
provisions of this act, to districts organized under this
act in their exercise of the rights, powers and franchises
and in the performance of the duties conferred or imposed
upon them under the provisions of this act. In addition to
any other rights and powers hereinabove conferred upon any
district organized under the provisions of this act, such
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293
district shall have and exercise the power of eminent
domain for the purposes and after the manner provided for
in sections 38-401 to 38-416, inclusive, of chapter 38 [§§
1-26-401, 1-26-403, 1-26-404] and in chapter 122, Wyoming
Revised Statutes, 1931, W.S. 1-26-501 through 1-26-818 or
in any one (1) or more of said sections or other applicable
sections in said statutes made and provided. If any such
district shall condemn private property or interests
therein, the appraisement shall include such amount of
damage as will accrue to the owner of the condemned
property through severance thereof from other property of
said owner, previously operated with that so condemned, as
a unit.

41-8-113. Board of directors; powers generally.

(a) Under the supervision of the board of
supervisors, the board of directors of a watershed
improvement district shall have power to:

(iii) Subject to the requirements of W.S.
41-2-124(m) if applicable, exercise the power of eminent
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293
domain and in the manner provided by law for the
condemnation of private property for public use;

41-9-202. Power of eminent domain.

Any drainage district created and existing under W.S.
41-9-101 through 41-9-278 may, whenever it shall require a
way of necessity outside its boundaries for any of its work
or works theretofore authorized by the court, proceed to
procure the same by the exercise of the power of eminent
domain subject to the requirements of W.S. 41-2-124(m) if
applicable.

41-10-113. Powers of district board.

(a) For and on behalf of the district the board of
any district shall have the following powers:

(xix) Subject to the requirements of W.S.
41-2-124(m) if applicable, to have and exercise the power
of eminent domain and dominant eminent domain and in the
manner provided by law for the condemnation by a city of
private property for public use to take any property
SF0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0293
necessary to the exercise of the powers granted, both
within and without the district;

Section 2. This act shall apply to all projects
receiving appropriations from water development accounts I
through III that are initiated on or after July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0118